Utah statutes.
17-30-10.   Appointments from eligible register -- Failure to accept appointment.

(1) When a peace officer is to be appointed, the appointing authority shall request the merit system commission to certify three eligible applicants for the position. The commission shall thereupon certify to the appointing authority the names of the three applicants standing highest on the eligible register. The appointing authority shall select and appoint one of the persons so certified.

(2)  In the event a certified person fails to accept a proffered appointment, he may, at his request, retain his place on the eligible register if he submits in writing reasons sufficient in the judgment of the commission to justify such failure.

